Utah statutes.
32A-1-806 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Special procedure for flavored malt
beverages.
(1)  If a flavored malt beverage is labeled or packaged in a manner that is
similar to a label or package used for a nonalcoholic beverage, beginning
October 1, 2008, a manufacturer of the flavored malt beverage may not
distribute or sell the flavored malt beverage in this state until the day on
which the manufacturer receives approval of the labeling and packaging from
the department in accordance with:
(a)  Sections 32A-1-804 and 32A-1-805; and
(b)  this section.
(2)  The department may not approve the labeling and packaging of a flavored
malt beverage described in Subsection (1) unless in addition to the
requirements of Section 32A-1-804 the labeling and packaging complies with the
following:
(a)  The label on the flavored malt beverage shall bear a prominently
displayed label or a firmly affixed sticker that provides the following
information:
(i)  the statement:
(A)  "alcoholic beverage"; or
(B)  "contains alcohol"; and
(ii)  the alcohol content of the flavored malt beverage.
(b)  Any packaging of the flavored malt beverage shall prominently include,
either imprinted on the packaging or imprinted on a sticker firmly affixed to
the packaging, the statement:
(i)  "alcoholic beverage"; or
(ii)  "contains alcohol".
(c)  A statement required by Subsection (2)(a) or (b) shall appear in a format
required by rule made by the commission in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter
3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(d)  A statement of alcohol content required by Subsection (2)(a)(ii):
(i)  shall state the alcohol content as a percentage of alcohol by volume or
by weight;
(ii)  may not use an abbreviation, but shall use the complete words "alcohol,"
"volume," or "weight"; and
(iii)  shall be in a format required by rule made by the commission.
(3)  The department may reject a label or packaging that appears designed to
obscure the information required by Subsection (2).
(4)  To determine whether or not a flavored malt beverage is described in
Subsection (1) and subject to this section, the department may consider in
addition to other factors one or more of the following factors:
(a)  whether the coloring, carbonation, and packaging of the flavored malt
beverage:
(i)  is similar to those of a nonalcoholic beverage or product; or
(ii)  can be confused with a nonalcoholic beverage;
(b)  whether the flavored malt beverage possesses a character and flavor
distinctive from a traditional malted beverage;
(c)  whether the flavored malt beverage is:
(i)  prepackaged;
(ii)  contains high levels of caffeine and other additives; and
(iii)  marketed as a beverage that is specifically designed to provide energy;
(d)  whether the flavored malt beverage contains added sweetener or sugar
substitutes; or
(e)  whether the flavored malt beverage contains an added fruit flavor or
other flavor that masks the taste of a traditional malted beverage.
